Illinois, session 104th, SB43.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Century Network Act is amended by 5changing Section 10 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3921/10)7    Sec. 10. Illinois Century Network. The Illinois Century 8Network shall be a service creating and maintaining high speed 9telecommunications networks that provide reliable 10communication links for wholesale connections with other 11registered or certified providers and the direct communication 12needs of various anchor institutions throughout Illinois. The 13Illinois Century Network may build on existing investments in 14networking schools, colleges, and universities. The Illinois 15Century Network may develop an end-to-end broadband network 16that may include, but may not be limited to, middle-mile and 17last-mile infrastructure , and shall avoid duplication of 18existing communication networks if those networks are capable 19of maintaining sufficient capacity to meet the requirements of 20anchor institutions.21    By July 1, 2019, the Department of Innovation and 22Technology shall perform a comprehensive review of the 23Illinois Century Network including, but not limited to,   SB0043- 2 -LRB104 03078 JRC 13096 b1assets, connections, hardware, and capacity of the current 2network. Nothing in this amendatory Act of the 100th General 3Assembly shall change contractual obligations of the Illinois 4Century Network that are effective on or before the effective 5date of this amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly. 6(Source: P.A. 100-611, eff. 7-20-18.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.